Illinois, session 104th, HB5781.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Legislative intent and purposes. 5        1. In 2024, Public Act 103-791 authorized the transfer 6    of the former Illinois National Guard Midway Armory 7    property, located at 5400 W. 63rd Street in Chicago, to 8    the City of Chicago for $1 for use as a Chicago Police 9    Department district facility.10        2. Following passage of that law, the City of Chicago 11    publicly declined to pursue the use of the property for a 12    police station, citing its location within a federally 13    regulated Runway Protection Zone (RPZ) for Midway 14    International Airport's Runway 4R/22L. As reported by the 15    Chicago Sun-Times on September 24, 2024, the City 16    determined that FAA safety regulations prohibit such a 17    public-serving use and that the site is unsuitable for a 18    new district headquarters. This position was further 19    reinforced in an October 7, 2024 article written by City 20    of Chicago Chief Operating Officer John Roberson, 21    published in the Chicago Sun-Times under the title "Why 22    vacant armory near Midway is a no-go as a police station". 23    In the article, Roberson stated that the site poses 24    "significant regulatory, safety and operational   HB5781- 2 -LRB104 20046 JRC 33497 b1    challenges" and that any future use must be compatible 2    with airport operations and current Federal Aviation 3    Authority regulations.4        3. The site, which has been vacant since 2017, remains 5    in State ownership. Given the site's regulatory 6    limitations and lack of local use compatibility, it is in 7    the public interest to authorize open-market disposition.8        4. Separately, the State of Illinois owns the historic 9    former armory located at 5500 S. Cottage Grove Avenue in 10    the Washington Park community area. This site has 11    significant community, cultural, and historic 12    redevelopment potential but requires substantial capital 13    investment for stabilization and adaptive reuse.14        5. Reinvesting the proceeds from the Midway Armory 15    sale into the 55th Street Armory aligns with the State's 16    goals of equitable reuse of surplus military properties 17    and preserving historically significant community anchors 18    on the South Side of Chicago. 19    Section 5. Authority to sell. The Department of Military 20Affairs is hereby authorized to sell, convey, lease, or 21otherwise dispose of all right, title, and interest in and to 22the real property commonly known as: 23    The Midway Flight Facility 5400 W. 63rd Street Chicago, 24    Illinois 60638   HB5781- 3 -LRB104 20046 JRC 33497 b1    Disposition may be by public sale, sealed bid, negotiated 2sale, or other method as permitted by applicable law and at 3such terms and conditions as the Adjutant General deems in the 4best interest of the State. No further authorization from the 5General Assembly shall be required to effectuate the 6transaction described in this Act. 7    Section 10. Conditions. The disposal of real property 8authorized in Section 5 is made subject to:9        1. all existing easements, encumbrances, covenants, 10    restrictions, and matters of record;11        2. all applicable local, state, and federal laws and 12    regulations, including, but not limited to, Federal 13    Aviation Authority restrictions related to the Runway 14    Protection Zone; and15        3. the purchaser's assumption of all liabilities and 16    responsibilities related to redevelopment, environmental 17    compliance, and regulatory approvals. 18    Section 15. Use of proceeds. All proceeds from the sale or 19disposition of the property identified in Section 5 must be 20deposited into the General Revenue Fund and, subject to 21appropriation by the General Assembly, must be designated for 22the rehabilitation, redevelopment, or reuse planning of the 23former Illinois National Guard Armory located at 5500 S.   HB5781- 4 -LRB104 20046 JRC 33497 b1Cottage Grove Avenue, Chicago, Illinois, in the Washington 2Park community area.3    The Department of Military Affairs, in coordination with 4the Illinois Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 5and other relevant agencies, must prioritize these funds for 6stabilization, feasibility assessments, community engagement, 7and redevelopment incentives for the 55th Street site. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.